North Dakota, session 69, SB2104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-02-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
15.1-02-04. Superintendent of public instruction - Duties - Report. (Effective through
December 31, 2024)
The superintendent of public instruction:
1. Shall supervise the provision of elementary and secondary education to the students
of this state.
2. Shall supervise the establishment and maintenance of schools and provide advice and
counsel regarding the welfare of the schools.
3. Shall supervise the development of course content standards.
4. Shall supervise the assessment of students.
5. Shall serve as an ex officio member of the board of university and school lands.
6. Shall keep a complete record of all official acts and appeals.
7. As appropriate, shall determine the outcome of appeals regarding education matters.
8. Shall direct school district annexation, reorganization, and dissolution and employ and
compensate personnel necessary to enable the state board of public school education
Page No. 1 25.0488.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
to carry out its powers and duties regarding school district annexation, reorganization,
and dissolution.
9. Shall facilitate a process to review and update annually the statewide prekindergarten
through grade twelve education strategic vision. The process must include input and
participation from a steering committee that includes representatives of all state-level
entities receiving state education funding and education stakeholder groups. Each
steering committee member entity receiving state education funds shall provide
components of the entity's strategic plan which are aligned to the statewide strategic
vision. The steering committee shall prepare a collaborative report of the strategic
plans of each committee member entity receiving state education funds. The
superintendent shall provide the collaborative report and any updates to the strategic
vision to the legislative management during each interim and to a joint meeting of the
education standing committees during each regular legislative session.
10. Shall facilitate the development and implementation of a North Dakota learning
continuum in collaboration with the department of career and technical education,
upon the recommendation of the kindergarten through grade twelve education
coordination council.
11. Shall appoint a task force in collaboration with the kindergarten through grade twelve
education coordination council. The task force shall review all statutes in this code
relating to literacy, dyslexia, and related teacher training and report the findings and
recommendations of the task force, together with any legislation necessary to
implement the recommendations, to the sixty-ninth legislative assembly.
Superintendent of public instruction - Duties - Report . (Effective after December 31,
2024) The superintendent of public instruction:
1. Shall supervise the provision of elementary and secondary education to the students
of this state.
2. Shall supervise the establishment and maintenance of schools and provide advice and
counsel regarding the welfare of the schools.
3. Shall supervise the development of course content standards.
4. Shall supervise the assessment of students.
5. Shall serve as an ex officio member of the board of university and school lands.
Page No. 2 25.0488.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
6. Shall keep a complete record of all official acts and appeals.
7. As appropriate, shall determine the outcome of appeals regarding education matters.
8. Shall direct school district annexation, reorganization, and dissolution and employ and
compensate personnel necessary to enable the state board of public school education
to carry out its powers and duties regarding school district annexation, reorganization,
and dissolution.
9. Shall facilitate a process to review and update annually the statewide prekindergarten
through grade twelve education strategic vision. The process must include input and
participation from a steering committee that includes representatives of all state-level
entities receiving state education funding and education stakeholder groups. Each
steering committee member entity receiving state education funds shall provide
components of the entity's strategic plan which are aligned to the statewide strategic
vision. The steering committee shall prepare a collaborative report of the strategic
plans of each committee member entity receiving state education funds. The
superintendent shall provide the collaborative report and any updates to the strategic
vision to the legislative management during each interim and to a joint meeting of the
education standing committees during each regular legislative session.
10. Shall facilitate the development and implementation of a North Dakota learning
continuum in collaboration with the department of career and technical education,
upon the recommendation of the kindergarten through grade twelve education
coordination council.
11. Shall review a school district to verify compliance with education-related state law and
may issue a corrective action .
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 15.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Review for compliance - Procedure - Complaints.
1. As used in this chapter, "education-related state law" means title 15.1, except chapters
15.1 - 15 and 15.1 - 16, unless the law has an alternative statutory enforcemen t
mechanism.
2. The superintendent of public instruction may conduct a review of a school district to
verify compliance with an education-related state law upon :
Page No. 3 25.0488.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. An exercise of discretion by the superintendent of public instruction, which may
be prompted by an allegation of noncompliance submitted under subsection 7 .
b. Receipt of a resolution passed by the majority of a board of a school distric t
alleging noncompliance with an education-related state law.
c. Written request of a county superintendent of schools alleging noncompliance
with an education-related state law.
3. If the superintendent of public instruction determines a review is required under
subsection 2, the superintendent of public instruction shall :
a. Notify the school district superintendent and the board of that school district of
the review . The notification must include :
(1) A description of the alleged noncompliance;
(2) A copy of any documentation submitted to the superintendent of public
instruction under subsection 2 alleging the noncompliance; and
(3) The anticipated scope and estimated timeline of the review .
b. Request information from the school district and review the information as
necessary to obtain facts related to the matter.
c. No later than ninety days after the school district has been notified of the review :
(1) Issue a corrective action to the school district, including a timeline for
compliance and suggested remedial steps to come into compliance; or
(2) Issue a letter of compliance to the school district closing the matte r .
4. If a school district fails to comply with a corrective action, the superintendent of public
instruction may issue a written warning to the school district. If the school district is not
in compliance within thirty days after the issuance of a written warning, the
superintendent of public instruction may impose sanctions pursuant to subsection 5 .
5. If a school district fails to comply with a corrective action within thirty days after the
issuance of a written warning , the superintendent of public instruction may impose
sanctions against the school district, including deducting up to two percent of the total
state payments to which a school district is entitled for that school year from the
subsequent payment distribution under section 15.1 - 27 - 01 for each corrective action
issued except the firs t .
Page No. 4 25.0488.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
6. The school district may request a hearing before the superintendent of public
instruction if a written request is made within ten days after the receipt of the corrective
action or sanction. Upon receipt of a proper and timely request for a hearing, the
superintendent of public instruction shall conduct an adjudicative proceeding under
this section in accordance with chapter 28 - 32, unless otherwise provided for by law. I f
the superintendent of public instruction prevails in an adjudicative proceeding under
this section, the department may assess the school district for all adjudicative
proceeding and hearing costs, including reasonable attorney's fees and costs and
expenses of the action.
7. The superintendent of public instruction shall provide a form that a state resident may
use to submit information alleging noncompliance with an education-related state law
to the superintendent of public instruction regarding the school district where the
resident is a qualified elector or the school district where the resident has a child
enrolled.
8. A school district subject to review by the superintendent of public instruction is
required to cooperate with the review to the full extent allowable by law. Failure of the
school district to cooperate fully with the review performed by the superintendent of
public instruction may be considered noncompliance with an education-related state
law under this section.
Page No. 5 25.0488.02000